Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 2

Accounts or Appropriations for Designated Purposes

9-4-201. Special federal funds.

The commissioner of finance and administration shall set up and maintain special accounts in the general fund with respect to moneys received for designated purposes from the federal government.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 21.

9-4-202. Separate account, collateral, and bond.

Notwithstanding any law or regulation to the contrary, any reference to a separate account in state law is deemed to mean a separate account within the state's accounting system and shall not require establishment of a separate account in a state depository.

Any reference to separate collateral shall be satisfied if sufficient total collateral is maintained in accordance with parts 1-4 of this chapter.

Any reference to separate bond shall be satisfied through coverage of the state treasurer by the state's blanket surety bond pursuant to § 4-4-108.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 22.

9-4-203. Trust funds.

Unless otherwise provided by law, the funding board established by §9-9-101 shall act as trustee for any funds which are directed to be held in trust by the state or any agency thereof. Unless otherwise provided by law, the state treasurer shall invest such trust funds under policy guidelines established by resolution of the funding board pursuant to §9-4-602. Each trust fund shall be responsible for administrative expenses incurred in the investment of such funds.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 23.

9-4-204. Police pay supplement fund.

There is created within the general fund a special agency account to be known as the “police pay supplement fund.”

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, all funds designated to fund the police pay supplement created pursuant to § 38-8-111 shall be deposited in the police pay supplement fund and disbursed in accordance with law solely for the payment of police pay supplements and such other uses as may be authorized by § 38-8-111.

Acts 1985, ch. 461, § 2; 2007, ch. 567, § 2; 2011, ch. 84, § 1.

9-4-205. Victims of crime assistance fund.

There is created a fund within the treasury of the state of Tennessee to be known as the “victims of crime assistance fund.”

Moneys shall be deposited to the fund pursuant to § 67-4-606 and as may be otherwise provided by law and shall be invested pursuant to § 9-4-603. Moneys in the fund shall not revert to the general fund of the state, but shall remain available for appropriation to victims of crime assistance programs as determined by the general assembly.

Funds in the victims of crime assistance fund and available federal funds, to the extent permitted by federal law and regulation, shall be used first to fund the victim-witness coordinator program established in § 8-7-206 and, to the extent that additional funds are available, to support other eligible victims of crime assistance programs. Such eligible victims of crime assistance programs shall include, but not be limited to, programs which provide appropriate counseling and support to victims, including each victim's family and programs which assist in the rehabilitation of victims of crime.

The commissioner of human services shall receive grant applications for funds and shall approve such grants as are desirable to effectuate the purposes of the Victims of Crime Assistance Act of 1986, as contained in this section and §§ 8-7-206, 40-24-107(e) [repealed], and 67-4-606(a)(5), to the full extent of available funding in the victims of crime assistance fund established by this section. To assist in establishing criteria, priorities and the review of grant applications, the commissioner of human services shall establish an advisory committee composed of persons from each grand division who are knowledgeable in establishing and administering victims of crime assistance programs.

Acts 1986, ch. 880, § 1; 2002, ch. 723, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Section 40-24-107(e), referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 2003, ch. 235, § 3, effective June 2, 2003.

Cross-References. Criminal injuries compensation fund, §40-24-107.

Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Rights of victims of crimes, Tenn. Const., art. I, § 35.

Victims bill of rights, title 40, ch. 38.

9-4-206. Impaired drivers trust fund.

There is created in the state treasury a fund to be known as the “impaired drivers trust fund.” Moneys shall be deposited in the fund as provided in § 55-10-413(b), and shall be invested for the benefit of the fund pursuant to § 9-4-603. Moneys in the fund shall not revert to the general fund of the state, but shall remain available to be used by the division of vocational rehabilitation in the department of human services exclusively for the purpose specified in subsection (b).

The purpose of the impaired drivers trust fund is to provide financial assistance unavailable through any other source to residents of the state who, as a result of a traumatic brain injury, require such assistance. Moneys in the fund shall, whenever possible, be utilized to match any available federal dollars, and such moneys from the trust fund and the federal match shall be utilized to provide services needed to assist persons suffering from traumatic brain injuries including, but not limited to, day care services, available physical therapy, and any other appropriate developmental programs.

As used in this subsection (b), “traumatic brain injury”:

Means an acquired injury to the brain caused by an external physical force resulting in total or partial disability or impairment;

Includes open and closed head injuries that may result in seizures, and/or in mild, moderate, or severe impairments in one (1) or more areas including cognition, language, memory, attention, reasoning, abstract thinking, psychosocial behavior, physical functions, information processing, and speech; and

Does not include brain injuries induced by birth trauma, but may include brain injuries caused by anoxia and other related causes, infectious disease not of a degenerative nature, brain tumor, toxic chemical or drug reactions.

Acts 1990, ch. 1081, § 2; 1993, ch. 470, § 1; 2013, ch. 154, § 30.

9-4-207. Transportation equity trust fund — Account.

There is hereby created a segregated account within the state treasury to be known as the “transportation equity trust fund.” Moneys shall be deposited to the fund pursuant to § 67-6-103(b), and shall be invested for the benefit of the fund pursuant to § 9-4-603. Moneys in the fund shall not revert to any other fund at the end of a fiscal year but shall remain available for appropriation by the general assembly for use as provided below.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, all funds directed to be deposited to the fund pursuant to § 67-6-103(b) shall be so deposited and shall be administered by the department of transportation and used only for the benefit and operation of railways, aeronautics, waterways programs and related activities.

Acts 1992, ch. 1015, § 1.

9-4-208. Appropriations to promote industries and facilities involving modern technologies — Audits.

It is in the interest of this state to promote, encourage and foster the commercial and economic interests of the state by attraction of industries, educational and research facilities, and other facilities involving modern technologies. In furtherance of this end, the general assembly may appropriate funds to organizations that carry out these purposes.

The comptroller of the treasury shall have the authority to audit any funds appropriated and/or expended pursuant to this section.

Acts 1984, ch. 970, § 1; T.C.A. §9-6-117.

9-4-209. Civil rights attorneys' fees awards account.

There is hereby created a fund or account, known as the “civil rights attorneys' fees awards account,” out of which federal court judgments awarding attorneys' fees in civil rights cases shall be paid where the state is liable for such judgments.

The civil rights attorneys' fees awards account shall be a sum sufficient account, and there shall be appropriated each year an amount sufficient to pay all fee awards for which the state is liable.

The civil rights attorneys' fees awards account shall be administered by the commissioner of finance and administration. Payments shall be made upon certification by the attorney general and reporter of the amount and liability of the state.

Acts 1984, ch. 985, §§ 1-3; T.C.A. §9-6-118.

Law Reviews.

Attorneys' Fees — Tennessee Recognizes the “Third Party Exception” to the American Rule, 16 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 399 (1986).

9-4-210. Increase in imprisonment terms — Appropriations for operating costs.

For any law enacted after July 1, 1986, which results in a net increase in periods of imprisonment in state facilities, there shall be appropriated from recurring revenues the estimated operating cost of such law.

“Operating costs,” as referred to in subsection (a), means all costs other than capital outlay costs.

The amount of appropriations made under subsections (a) and (d) shall be equal to the amounts reflected in fiscal notes prepared by the staff of the fiscal review committee. For purposes of subsection (a), such cost shall be the operating cost, in current dollars, of the highest of the next ten (10) fiscal years commencing after December 4, 1985.

Prior to submission of the budget for fiscal years beginning after 1986-1987, estimates of appropriations made under subsection (a) may be adjusted to determine the amount of appropriations of recurring revenues to be repeated for the ensuing fiscal year. If no adjustment is made, then the amount of appropriations previously made shall be repeated.

Appropriations made under this section shall be placed in a reserve to be used only for the following purposes:

Cancellation of bonds authorized but not yet sold; and

Capital outlay for the department of correction.

Any law enacted without the funding required by this section shall be null and void unless such funding is appropriated in the general appropriations act.

Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, §§ 1-6; T.C.A. §9-6-119.

Attorney General Opinions. Effect of T.C.A. §9-4-210 on general assembly elected after its passage, OAG 08-195, 2008 Tenn. AG LEXIS 240 (12/31/08).

9-4-211. Reserve for revenue fluctuations.

There is hereby created on the books and records of the state treasury a reserve account in the general fund to be known as the “reserve for revenue fluctuations.” Amounts which may from time to time be in this reserve shall be available, as hereinafter provided, to meet unexpected shortfalls of revenue or to meet expenditure requirements in excess of budgeted appropriation levels.

Each year, beginning with the budget for the 1998-1999 fiscal year, the governor shall include in the budget document and the general appropriations bill prepared pursuant to § 9-4-5106, an amount to be allocated to this reserve at least equal to ten percent (10%) of the estimated growth in state tax revenues to be allocated to the general fund and the education trust fund. This allocation shall be included in the budget presented each year until the amount in the reserve equals eight percent (8%) of the estimated state tax revenues to be allocated to the general fund and the education trust fund for that year. In subsequent budgets, the governor shall include an allocation to the reserve equal to the lesser of:

An amount equal to ten percent (10%) of the estimated growth in state tax revenues to be allocated to the general fund and the education trust fund; or

An amount sufficient to maintain the reserve at eight percent (8%) of the estimated state tax revenues to be allocated to the general fund and the education trust fund for that year.

Amounts available in the revenue fluctuation reserve may be used by the commissioner of finance and administration to offset shortfalls in state tax revenues which may occur and for which funds are not otherwise available. It is hereby declared to be the legislative intent that to the extent practicable, all revenue shortfalls will be offset by reductions in expenditures before using amounts in the revenue fluctuation reserve.

Upon determining that it is likely that amounts in the revenue fluctuation reserve will be required to be utilized to meet a shortfall of state tax revenue, the commissioner shall report this determination immediately to the chairs of the finance, ways and means committees of the senate and the house of representatives. Upon receipt of such notification, each chair shall, as soon as practicable, call a meeting of the finance, ways and means committees, at which time the commissioner shall report information concerning the need to utilize amounts in the revenue fluctuation reserve. At the discretion of the chairs, the committees may meet jointly to receive the commissioner's report.

Subject to specific provisions of the general appropriations bill, an amount not to exceed the greater of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) or one-half (½) of the amount available in the reserve may be used by the commissioner to meet expenditure requirements in excess of budgeted appropriation levels. It is hereby declared to be the legislative intent that any such excess expenditure requirements be avoided by reducing such requirements insofar as possible. Prior to using any amounts in the reserve for this purpose, the commissioner shall notify the secretary of the state funding board and the chairs of the finance, ways and means committees of the senate and the house of representatives that the reserve funds are to be used for this purpose. Upon receipt of such notification, each chair shall, as soon as practicable, call a meeting of the finance, ways and means committees, at which time the commissioner shall report information concerning the need to utilize amounts in the revenue fluctuation reserve. At the discretion of the chairs, the committees may meet jointly to receive the commissioner's report.

Acts 1987, ch. 429, § 1; 1996, ch. 832, § 1; T.C.A. §9-6-120; Acts 2003, ch. 355, § 12; 2013, ch. 175, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subdivision (a)(2)(C), concerning subdivision (a)(2) not applying in the fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2003, and ending on June 30, 2004, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 355, § 66 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to the act shall be made in violation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d.

Attorney General Opinions. State tax revenue allocated to the Rainy Day Fund in the budget document should not be included in “appropriations from state tax revenues” when determining whether the Copeland Cap has been exceeded. When state officials calculate the rate of growth, they may include only appropriations from state tax revenues that are received in the fiscal year. Appropriations from the reserve for revenue fluctuation, to the extent it includes state tax revenue from the earlier year, are not included in the Copeland Cap calculation. OAG 18-05, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 5 (2/12/2018).

9-4-212. State appropriations to nongovernmental defender services in capital cases.

No state funds for appeals of capital cases shall be appropriated for or allocated to The Capital Case Resource Center of Tennessee, Inc., or any other nongovernmental corporation or organization, except that this prohibition shall not apply to an individual member of the bar appointed by a court to represent an indigent defendant.

Acts 1995, ch. 528, § 1; T.C.A. §9-6-122.

9-4-213. State appropriations to child advocacy centers.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), on and after July 1, 1998, no state funds appropriated specifically for child advocacy centers shall be allocated or paid to any such center unless the center clearly demonstrates that it:

Is a nonprofit corporation which has received a determination of exemption from the internal revenue service under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3);

Employs an executive director who is answerable to the board of directors and who is not the salaried employee of any governmental entity signing the memorandum of understanding and working protocol identified in subdivision (a)(3);

Has a signed memorandum of understanding and working protocol executed among:

The department of children's services;

All county and municipal law enforcement agencies within the geographical area served by the center;

All district attorneys general offices within the geographical area served by the center; and

Any other governmental entity which participates in child abuse investigations or offers services to child abuse victims within the geographical area served by the center;

Facilitates the use of a multidisciplinary team (representing prosecution, law enforcement, mental health, medical, child protective and social services professionals and the juvenile court) which jointly:

Assess victims of child abuse and their families; and

Determine the need for services;

Provides a facility that is child-focused, neutral, comfortable, private, and safe, where the multidisciplinary team can meet to coordinate the efficient and appropriate disposition of child abuse cases through the civil and criminal justice systems;

Provides for the provision of needed services, referral to such services, and case tracking;

Has written policies and procedures consistent with the standards established by the National Children's Alliance; and

Agrees to accurately collect and report key outcome data and information relative to each center's operations to the Tennessee chapter of children's advocacy centers, which is the statewide membership organization. The Tennessee chapter of children's advocacy centers shall compile and report such data annually to the chairs of the judiciary and health and welfare committees of the senate, the chair of the health committee of the house of representatives, and the chair of the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over children and families. The data and information collected pursuant to this subdivision (a)(8) shall include, at a minimum, the following:

Number and demographic profiles of cases served by age, gender, race, type of abuse, and treatment thereof, including mental health and medical services rendered;

Demographic profiles of perpetrators of abuse by age, gender, race, relationship to victim, and the outcome of any legal action taken against such perpetrators;

Nature of services and support provided by or through the center; and

Data and information relative to community investment in and community support of the center.

On and after July 1, 1998, no state funds appropriated specifically for one-time, start-up assistance for new child advocacy centers shall be allocated or paid to any such center unless the center clearly demonstrates that it:

Has a signed memorandum of understanding and working protocol executed among:

The department of children's services;

All county and municipal law enforcement agencies within the area served by the center;

All district attorneys general offices within the area served by the center; and

Any other governmental entity which participates in child abuse investigations or offers services to child abuse victims within the area served by the center; and

Has formally filed an application for a determination of exemption from the internal revenue service under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3).

After receiving any such start-up assistance, no additional state funds appropriated specifically for child advocacy centers shall be allocated or paid to such center unless the center clearly demonstrates that it complies with the enumerated requirements set forth in subsection (a).

In those geographical areas in which a child advocacy center meets the requirements of subsection (a) or (b), child advocacy center directors or their designees shall be members of the child protective multi-disciplinary teams under title 37, chapter 1, parts 4 and 6, for purposes of provision of services and functions established by this section or delegated pursuant to this section. In such event, child advocacy center directors or their designees may access and generate all necessary information, which shall retain its confidential status, consistent with § 37-1-612.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, the department of children's services, or any other department administering state funds specially appropriated for child advocacy centers, shall continue to allocate and/or pay such funds to existing child advocacy centers with active applications on file with the department, if such centers demonstrate satisfactory progress in efforts to achieve compliance with this section.

Acts 1998, ch. 988, § 1; T.C.A. §9-6-123; Acts 1999, ch. 453, § 3; 2011, ch. 410, § 3(a); 2013, ch. 236, § 21; 2018, ch. 678, §§ 1-3; 2019, ch. 345, § 17.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

9-4-214. Victims of human trafficking fund.

There is created a fund within the state treasury, to be known as the “victims of human trafficking fund.” The fund consists of grants, appropriations by the general assembly, and any federal funds, to the extent permitted by federal law and regulation. Moneys deposited in the fund must be invested for the benefit of the fund pursuant to § 9-4-603. Moneys in the fund must not revert to the general fund, but must remain available to be used by the department of finance and administration's office of criminal justice programs exclusively for the purpose specified in subsection (b). The commissioner of the department of finance and administration has the authority to promulgate rules in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, in order to ensure the funds are received and expended for the purposes consistent with subsection (b).

The purpose of the victims of human trafficking fund is to provide specialized comprehensive treatment and support services to the victims of human trafficking offenses, as defined in § 39-13-314. Specialized comprehensive treatment and support services for victims of human trafficking include, but are not limited to, medical care, mental health and substance abuse care, nutritional counseling, safe housing, job training, transportation, and other basic human needs. The department of finance and administration's office of criminal justice programs shall distribute moneys in the fund in the form of grants to agencies that provide specialized comprehensive treatment and support services for the victims of human trafficking. It is the legislative intent that priority for funding be directed to the single point of contact agencies in this state recognized by the Tennessee bureau of investigation and the department of children's services.

Acts 2019, ch. 356, § 1.